Wyoming, session 2026, HB0032.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-18-608 is created to read:
31-18-608. English language proficiency for operators
of commercial vehicles; penalties.
(a) As used in this section, "proficiency in the
English language" means an operator of a commercial vehicle
can demonstrate proficiency of the English language in
accordance with 49 C.F.R. § 391.11(b)(2).
(b) No operator of a commercial vehicle shall operate
a commercial vehicle within this state if the operator is
unable to demonstrate proficiency in the English language.
Any operator of a commercial vehicle who violates this
subsection shall be fined one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)
and shall be prohibited from operating a commercial vehicle
within this state until the operator is able to demonstrate
proficiency in the English language.
(c) Any operator of a commercial vehicle who operates
a commercial vehicle within this state while under the
prohibition imposed by subsection (b) of this section
shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and
shall be punished by an additional fine of one thousand
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0032
ENROLLED ACT NO. 7, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
dollars ($1,000.00), by imprisonment for not more than
ninety (90) days, or both.
Section 2. W.S. 31-18-701 by creating a new
subsection (d) is amended to read:
31-18-701. Specific crimes and penalties;
enforcement.
(d) The highway patrol division, any other
enforcement officers designated by the department and any
peace officer of any county or municipality shall:
(i) Be charged with the duty of policing and
enforcing the provisions of W.S. 31-18-608; and
(ii) Have the authority to issue citations for
violations for any provisions of W.S. 31-18-608.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0032
ENROLLED ACT NO. 7, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3